Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-2504
Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program; established.

The department shall establish and administer the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program. The grant program shall provide grants to community-based organizations working in partnership with schools in high-need school districts to provide expanded learning opportunity programs.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 18.